District of Columbia statutes.
38-2806

Accountability Plan.

The Superintendent shall, by December 15, 1998, provide an Accountability Plan for each school. The Accountability Plan shall set forth five-year student achievement test goals and year one benchmarks, as measured against a baseline derived from student performance levels determined by the “Stanford 9” tests administered in Spring 1998.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1107, 45 DCR 7193
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1B 1981 Ed., see notes following § 38-2801.
For temporary addition of subchapter see notes to § 38-2801.
1981 Ed., § 31-156.